Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8548.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-21.1-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-21.1 entitled
"Transportation of School Pupils Beyond City and Town Limits [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The
Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-21.1-2. School bus districts established.
(a) There are hereby established school bus districts within the state to provide bus
transportation in the interest of public safety, health, and welfare for pupils in grades kindergarten
through twelve (12), or in special education programs, who attend public schools, including
vocational schools and special education programs provided in accord with regulations of the board
of regents for elementary and secondary education, consolidated schools, regional schools
established under the provisions of § 16-3-1 et seq., or who participate in cooperative programs as
provided by § 16-3.1-1 et seq., and nonpublic nonprofit schools which are consolidated,
regionalized, or otherwise established to serve residents of a specific area within the state which
schools satisfy the requirements of law for any of the grades of school, kindergarten through twelve
(12), as follows:
(1) Region I: The towns of Burrillville, North Smithfield, and Cumberland, and the city of
Woonsocket;
(2) Region II: The county of Kent, except the town of West Greenwich and the towns of
Foster, Glocester, and Scituate;

(3) Region III: The towns of Lincoln, Smithfield, Johnston, North Providence, Barrington,
Warren, and Bristol, and the cities of Cranston, Central Falls, East Providence, Pawtucket, and
Providence;
(4) Region IV: The county of Washington and the towns of Jamestown and West
Greenwich;
(5) Region V: The towns of Little Compton, Middletown, Portsmouth, Warren, Bristol,
and Tiverton, and the city of Newport.
(b) A pupil attending a school, including a public school, vocational school, special
education program provided in accord with regulations of the board of regents for elementary and
secondary education, a regional school established under the provisions of § 16-3-1 et seq., as
authorized by § 16-3.1-1 et seq., or a nonpublic nonprofit school for grades kindergarten through
twelve (12), consolidated, regionalized, or otherwise established to serve residents of a specific
area within the state for any of the grades of schools, kindergarten through twelve (12), in the
interest of public safety, health, and welfare, shall be provided with bus transportation to the school
or facility which the pupil attends, within the region in which the pupil resides, by the school
committee of the city or town within which the pupil resides. The cost of transporting a pupil
attending a charter school, the William M. Davies, Jr. Career and Technical High School
(“Davies”), or the Metropolitan Regional Career and Technical Center (“the Met Center”) within
the established region shall be charged to the receiving school at the same grade level transportation
per pupil cost of the resident district. Districts may offer transportation to charter schools, Davies,
or the Met Center outside the established region in order to facilitate efficiency provided there is
not additional cost to the resident district.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026
========
LC006454
========
LC006454 - Page 2 of 3